Utah statutes.
61-2-18.   Actions for recovery of compensation restricted.
(1)  No person may bring or maintain an action in any court of this state for
the recovery of a commission, fee, or compensation for any act done or service
rendered which is prohibited under this chapter to other than licensed
principal brokers, unless the person was duly licensed as a principal broker
at the time of the doing of the act or rendering the service.
(2)  No sales agent or associate broker may sue in his own name for the
recovery of a fee, commission, or compensation for services as a sales agent
or associate broker unless the action is against the principal broker with
whom he is or was licensed.  Any action for the recovery of a fee, commission,
or other compensation may only be instituted and brought by the principal
broker with whom the sales agent or associate broker is affiliated.
